District of Columbia statutes.
6-1007

Construction; severability.

(a)

To the extent that any provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any other laws within the jurisdiction of the Council, the provisions of this chapter shall prevail and shall be deemed to supersede the provisions of such laws.

(b)

If any provisions of this chapter be held invalid, the remainder of the chapter shall not be impaired thereby, but shall continue in full force and effect.

Dec. 16, 1975, D.C. Law 1-39, § 8, 22 DCR 3451
1981 Ed., § 5-907.
1973 Ed., § 5-1007.